apertium-uzb.uzb.lexc
LEXICON VERB-COPULA

%<cop%>: GERUND ;
%<cop%>: PRES-CONT ;
%<cop%>: PRES-COND ;
%<cop%>: INDEF-PAST ;
%<cop%>: PAST ;
%<cop%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<cop%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<cop%>: KAN ;
%<cop%>: PERS ; 

LEXICON KAN  

%<kan%>:%>kan # ;
%<kan%>%<neg%>:%>kansiz # ;





LEXICON NON-FINITE




%<inf%>:%>moq CASE ;
%<gna2%>:%>ib # ;
%<part%>:%>ing SUBST ; 
%<gna3%>:%>gach # ;
%<gna1%>:%>ish # ;
%<gna4%>:%>ayotgan SUBST;






LEXICON PRES-COND 

%<pcond%>:%>sa PERS2 ;


LEXICON GERUND 

%<ger5%>:%>gan SUBST ;    
%<ger5%>:%>ish SUBST ;    


LEXICON IMPERATIVE

%<imp%>:%> # ;


LEXICON INDEF-PAST

%<past%>:%>gan PERS2 ;

LEXICON PAST

%<past%>:%>%di PERS2 ;

LEXICON EVIDENTIAL-PAST

%<evid%>:%>mish PERS ;

LEXICON PERMISSIVE

%<perm%>:%>sin # ; 


LEXICON PRES-CONT 

%<pcont%>:%>yap PERS ;

LEXICON AORIST

%<aor%>:%>%{E%} PERS3 ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON

! Pointed to by: V-PERS-S1 and V-PERS-AOR
! Irregular p1.sg form is in V-PERS-AOR

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}n CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}ng CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}z CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}ngd%{A%}r CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}z CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}zl%{A%}r CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1

! Used for: -AR-<fut>, -GAn-<past>, -MAK-<fut_plan>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ng CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ngd%{A%}r CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ng%{I%}z CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>ng%{I%}zl%{A%}r CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PERS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>man  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>san  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>ti  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>siz # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>miz  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>tilar  # ;

LEXICON PERS2

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ng  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ning  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>ishsa  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>lar  # ;

LEXICON PERS3 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>man  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>san  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>di  # ;
! %<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;

%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>siz # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>miz  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>tilar  # ;


LEXICON ADV1
%<adv%>: # ; ! this is for when the adverb is used as an adverb
%<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV2

%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV3

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: #;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT 

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;


LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON A2 


%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON A4

%<adj%>: # ; 


LEXICON PRON-REF

%<prn%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-ADV 

%<prn%>%<adv%>: CASE-NONOM ; 
%<prn%>%<adv%>:  POSS-REAL-NONOM ; 



LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!NOUNS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N1 ! Lexicon used for general nouns with no particularities. It takes PLURAL*-POSSESSIVE*-CASE in this order

%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ; 

LEXICON MIST

%<mistake%>: # ;


LEXICON N3 ! Nationalities which can form language, etc.
           ! e.g. turk, turkçe

%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON CLIT-QST-MA

%+ma%<qst%>:%>% %{M%}%{A%} # ;

LEXICON CLIT-QST

CLIT-QST-MA ;
%+mekan%<qst%>:% %{M%}ekan # ;

LEXICON CLIT-MODASS

%+go%<mod_ass%>:% go # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-GHANA-ETC

%+%-ak%<postadv%>:%-ak # ; ! ""
%+gana%<postadv%>:% %{G%}ana # ; ! ""
%+da%<cnjcoo%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
%+da%<postadv%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-COP

%+e%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP

CLIT-QST ;
CLIT-MODASS ;
CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST

CLIT-MODASS ;
CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CLITICS-INCL-COP         ! Can appear only after nominals
                                 ! (and only after some cases).
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLIT-COP ;

LEXICON CASES-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ng CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
! %<ins%>:%>%{M%}en CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON CASES

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!
! <n.pl.нікі.pl> sequence should not be allowed. This form is rare (1 (!)
! match in RFERL corpus for 'нікілар'), probably not worh bothering at all.
! It could be handled in a way abessive is handled, but since NIKI in contrast
! to the abessive SIZ can appear after possessves, that would require
! duplicating possessives as well.
!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!
! try нікілер?  -JNW

!gen.subst part was:
!%<px%>:%>%{N%}iki%{n%} CASES ;
!%<px%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}iki%>l%{A%}r CASES ;

%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}iki%{n%} CASES ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}iki%>l%{A%}r CASES ;

%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}y CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! Probably should be CLITICS-INCL-COP, same for all <sim> -JNW 2015-01-17

LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}m CASES-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ng CASES-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}m%{I%}z CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ngd%{A%}r CASES-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ng%{I%}z CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ng%{I%}zl%{A%}r CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION

%+siz%<post%>:%>s%{I%}z CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON LI-POSTPOSITION

%+li%<post%>:%>%{L%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON
FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NP1-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r NP-COMMON ;
! %<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: SUBST;


LEXICON NP1-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r NP-COMMON ;
! %<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NP1-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON NP1-AL

%<np%>%<al%>%: SUBST;


!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASES ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r CASES ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

!%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+siz%<post%>:%>s%{I%}z CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2014-08-16//FMT: this was "GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST"

LEXICON GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<gen%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%>%{N%}iki%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2015-01-18//JNW: added <nom>, since it needs a case for transfer, and no other cases are ever added, or even presumed by the transducer to be okay.  But worth CHECK ing..
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} GER-ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}y CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON Mistakes
FA:FA MIST ;
lgan:lgan MIST ; !""
ng:ng MIST ; ! ""
j:j MIST ; 
ga:ga MIST ; ! ""
ta:ta MIST ; ! ""
mo:mo MIST ; ! ""
qad:qad MIST ; ! ""
le:le MIST ; ! ""
LEXICON Nouns
qumtosh:qumtosh N1 ; ! "sandstone"
metr:metr N1 ; ! "meter"
tarjima:tarjima N1 ; ! "translation"
Shimoliy:Shimoliy N1 ; ! "north"
qoldiq:qoldiq N1 ; ! "remainder"
tegish:tegish N1 ; ! "share"
maishiy:maishiy A1 ; ! "social"
tarixchi:tarixchi N1 ; ! "historian"
suvo%'t:suvo%'t N1 ; ! "water plant"
yahudiy:yahudiy N3 ; ! "jewish"
Xorvat:Xorvat N3 ; ! "Croatian"
Rus:Rus N3 ; ! "Russian"
Arman:Arman N3 ; ! "Armenian
O%'zbek:O%'zbek N3 ; ! "Uzbek"
Qirgiz:Qirgiz N3 ; ! "Kirghiz"
Yevropalik:Yevropalik N3 ; ! "European"
Mojar:Mojar N3 ; ! "Hungarian"
Corrèze:Corrèze NP-TOP ; ! ""
Chuy:Chuy NP-TOP ; ! "Chuy"
Varese:Varese NP-TOP ; ! ""
Lecco:Lecco NP-TOP ; ! ""
Qurama:Qurama NP-TOP ; ! "Qurama"  *********** couldn't find turkish
O%'zbekiston:O%'zbekiston NP-TOP ; ! ""
Urganch:Urganch NP-TOP ; ! ''
Marina:Marina NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Maryam:Maryam NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Albert:Albert NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Branislav:Branislav NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Dick:Dick NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Veronika:Veronika NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Erkan:Erkan NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Igor:Igor NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Kükes:Kükes NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Paddy:Paddy NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Layli:Layli NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Balx:Balx NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Stjepan:Stjepan NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Rahimov:Rahimov NP1-COG-MF; ! ""
Hujjati:Hujjati NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Gul:Gul NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Berdimuhammedov:Berdimuhammedov NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Gul:Gul NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Nobel:Nobel NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Abdullayev:Abdullayev NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Montgomery:Montgomery NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Marie:Marie NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Aygul:Aygul NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Galicia:Galicia NP-TOP ; ! "Galicia"
Centre:Centre NP1-AL ; ! ""
HIV:HIV NP1-AL ; ! "" @?@
Nobel:Nobel NP1-AL ; ! ""
B92:B92 NP1-AL ; ! ""
Eurovision:Eurovision NP1-AL ; ! ""
G17:G17 NP1-AL ; ! ""
Europe:Europe NP1-AL ; ! ""
News NP1-AL ; ! "" @@@
LEXICON Postpositions
haqida:haqida POST ; ! "about"
tufayli:tufayli POST ; ! "because of"
nari:nari POST ; ! ""
burun:burun POST ; ! ""
sayin:sayin POST ; ! ""
to%'g%'risida:to%'g%'risida POST ; ! ""
qarshi:qarshi POST ; ! "against/despite"
boshqa:boshqa POST ; ! "in addition"
oldin:oldin POST ; ! "before"
LEXICON Adjectives
ortiqcha:ortiqcha A1 ; ! "too much"
ekvatorial:ekvatorial A1 ; ! "equatorial"
kunlik:kunlik A1 ; ! "daily"
dramatik:dramatik A1 ; ! "dramatic"
qimmatbaho:qimmatbaho A1 ; ! "priceless"
davriy:davriy A1 ;  ! "cyclical"
zamonaviy:zamonaviy A2 ; ! "modern"
qobiliyatli:qobiliyatli A2 ; ! "capable"
yosh:yosh A2 ; ! "young"
mumkin:mumkin A2 ; ! "possible"
chiroyli:chiroyli A2 ; ! "nice"
yaqin:yaqin A2 ; ! "next"
rangli:rangli A2 ; ! "colored"
ma%'noli:ma%'noli A2 ; ! "meaningful"
yillik:yillik A2 ; ! "uch yillik"
mayda:mayda A1 ; ! "tiny"
klassik:klassik A1 ; ! "classical"
bor:bor A4 ; ! "there is"
emas:emas A4 ; ! "there is not"
lozim:lozim A4 ; ! "necessary"
o%'z:o%'z PRON-REF ; ! "self"
LEXICON Verbs
e:e VERB-COPULA ; ! "special copula"
 LEXICON Adverbs
qayerda:qayerda ADV-ITG ; ! "where (где)"
qayerga:qayerga ADV-ITG ; ! "where (куда)"
qayerdan:qayerdan ADV-ITG ; ! ""
qanday:qanday ADV-ITG ; ! "how"
qachon:qachon ADV-ITG ; ! "when"
nimaga:nimaga ADV-ITG ; ! "why"
qaytadan:qaytadan ADV1 ; ! "once more"
quyidagicha:quyidagicha ADV1 ; ! "as stated below"
taxminan:taxminan ADV1 ; ! "approximately"
deyarli:deyarli ADV1 ; ! "almost"
erta:erta ADV1 ; ! "early"
deyarli:deyarli ADV1 ; ! "nearly"
butunlay:butunlay ADV1 ; ! "completely"
keyinchalik:keyinchalik ADV1 ; ! "afterwards"
hali:hali ADV3 ; ! "a while ago"
endi:endi ADV3 ; ! "now"
eng:eng ADV3 ; ! "the most"
axtarish:axtarish ADV3 ; ! "afterwards"
shunday:shunday ADV3 ; ! "in that way"
bugun:bugun ADV3 ; ! "today"
xuddi:xuddi ADV3 ; ! "nearly"
ortiq:ortiq ADV3 ; ! "artik"
hozir:hozir ADV3 ; ! "now"
ichida:ichida ADV1 ; ! "indoor"
biroz:biroz ADV2 ; ! "slightly"
aniq:aniq ADV2 ; ! "evidently"
ayniqsa:ayniqsa ADV2 ; ! "specially"
tez:tez ADV2 ; ! "fast"
kech:kech ADV2 ; ! "late",
orqaga:orqaga ADV2 ; ! "backwards"
bosqichmabosqich:bosqichmabosqich ADV2 ; ! "gradually"
jiddiy:jiddiy ADV2 ; ! "philosophically"
qisman:qisman ADV2 ; ! "partly" "tolerable"
